Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

28-5-100.3. Definitions.

As used in this article 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Discharged LGBT veteran" means a person who the state board of veterans affairs determines to be a discharged LGBT veteran pursuant to section 28-5-103.

"Veteran" means a person who served in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States and who was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable, in accordance with U.S.C. title 38, as amended.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1125), ch. 38, p. 95, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 174, § 3, effective November 11.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 16-1125, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

(2) For the short title ("Restoration of Honor Act") in SB 21-026, see section 1 of chapter 42, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

28-5-101. Military discharges recorded free.

For the purpose of preserving a record of men and women who served with the armed forces of the United States and who are now or may become residents of Colorado, the clerk and recorders of the various counties of the state are directed to record discharges for such men and women without charging any fees therefor.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 641, § 1.

CSA:

C. 150, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 143-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 144-4-1.

28-5-102. Identity documents - veteran identifier.

A driver's license or identification card, issued under article 2 of title 42, C.R.S., that identifies the holder as a veteran is sufficient documentation that a person is a veteran for the purposes of any benefit or preference given to veterans by the state of Colorado or any political subdivision of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1119), ch.177, p. 654, § 3, effective August 7.

28-5-103. Discharged LGBT veteran.

A person is a discharged LGBT veteran if the person, as determined by the board of veterans affairs, was discharged from the armed services due to the person's sexual orientation or gender identity or gender expression; or statements, consensual sexual conduct, or consensual acts relating to sexual orientation or gender identity or gender expression unless the statements, conduct, or acts are prohibited by the uniform code of military justice on grounds other than the person's sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression; or the disclosure of statements, conduct, or acts relating to sexual orientation or gender identity or gender expression that were prohibited by the armed services at the time of discharge.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) of this section, a person who received a dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or, if the person was an officer, a dismissal from the armed services is not eligible to be a discharged LGBT veteran.

Upon application, and in accordance with the process established by the division of veterans affairs pursuant to this section, the board of veterans affairs shall determine whether a person is a discharged LGBT veteran.

The division of veterans affairs shall establish a consistent and uniform process to determine whether a person is a discharged LGBT veteran, including, at a minimum, standards for verifying the person's status as a discharged LGBT veteran.

The process must require a person applying for classification as a discharged LGBT veteran to submit a copy of the person's DD214 form issued by the United States government, a personal affidavit of the circumstances surrounding the discharge, and any relevant records pertaining to the discharge.

A person who does not have the documents described in subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section is not automatically disqualified from being classified as a discharged LGBT veteran. If the person does not have the documents, the person must submit an affidavit certifying that the person does not have the documents.

The division of veterans affairs shall establish a method for a person determined by the board of veterans affairs to be a discharged LGBT veteran to demonstrate status as a discharged LGBT veteran.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 173, § 2, effective November 11.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Restoration of Honor Act") in SB 21-026, see section 1 of chapter 42, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.